Alaska, session 34, HB334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 18.50.320 is amended to read: 06 Sec. 18.50.320. Copies of data from vital records. Except as otherwise 07 provided and in accordance with the regulations adopted under AS 18.50.310, 08 (1) the bureau and the custodian of permanent local records shall, upon 09 request, issue a certified copy of a certificate or record in their custody, or a part of it; 10 each copy issued must show the date of registration or recording, and copies issued 11 from records marked "delayed," "amended," or "court order" shall be similarly marked 12 and must show the effective date; 13 (2) a certified copy of a certificate or a part of it issued in accordance 14 with (1) of this subsection [SECTION] is considered the original for all purposes and 01 is prima facie evidence of the facts stated; however, the evidentiary value of a 02 certificate or record filed more than one year after the event, or a record that has been 03 amended, or a presumptive death certificate, shall be determined by the judicial or 04 administrative body or official before whom the certificate is offered as evidence; 05 (3) the National Office of Vital Statistics may be furnished the copies 06 or data it requires for national statistics if the bureau is reimbursed for the cost of 07 furnishing the data; the National Office of Vital Statistics may not use the data for 08 purposes other than statistical purposes unless authorized by the state registrar; 09 (4) federal, state, local, and other public or private agencies, upon 10 request, may be furnished copies or data for statistical purposes on the terms or 11 conditions prescribed by the bureau; 12 (5) a person or agency may not prepare or issue a certificate or part of 13 a certificate that purports to be an original, certified copy, or copy of a certificate of 14 birth, death, fetal death, or marriage, except as authorized in this chapter or the 15 regulations adopted under it; 16 (6) upon request, the bureau shall furnish a copy of a certificate or 17 record registered by the bureau to the child support services agency created in 18 AS 25.27.010, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child 19 support purposes authorized under law; such a certificate or record that is prepared or 20 maintained in an electronic data base may be supplied by providing the requesting 21 agency with a copy of the electronic certificate or record and a statement certifying its 22 contents; 23 (7) the bureau shall issue up to four certified copies of the death 24 certificate of a veteran without charge; under this paragraph, certified copies of a 25 veteran's death certificate are available without charge only to a qualified person; in 26 this paragraph, 27 (A) "qualified person" means an individual who is 28 (i) a personal representative of the veteran's estate; 29 (ii) a trustee of a revocable trust of which the veteran 30 was the settlor; or 31 (iii) a person who needs a certified copy of the veteran's 01 death certificate for the purpose of satisfying an eligibility requirement 02 for a benefit related to the death of the veteran; 03 (B) "veteran" means an individual who was 04 (i) on active duty at the time of the veteran's death or 05 had received an honorable or general discharge from a branch of the 06 armed services of the United States, the National Guard, a reserve unit 07 of the United States armed services, the Alaska Scouts, the Alaska 08 Territorial Guard, or the Alaska Naval Militia; and 09 (ii) a resident of the state at the time of the individual's 10 death. 11 * Sec. 2. AS 18.50.320 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 12 (b) If a person meets the requirements for fee waiver under AS 18.50.330(c), 13 the bureau and the custodian of permanent local records shall accept as proof of 14 identity in the person's request for a certified copy of the person's birth certificate 15 (1) an expired or unexpired government-issued photo identification; 16 (2) two of the following documents: 17 (A) an official secondary or postsecondary school record that 18 contains the name, the date of birth, and a description of the person; 19 (B) an education or medical record containing the name and 20 date of birth of the person; 21 (C) an affidavit from another person attesting to the person's 22 identity; 23 (D) other documents containing requisite information to prove 24 identity as determined by the department in regulation; or 25 (3) other proof of identity accepted by the bureau and the custodian of 26 permanent local records for the issuance of a certified copy of a birth certificate. 27 * Sec. 3. AS 18.50.330 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 28 (c) The state registrar may not charge a fee to a person who is unhoused and at 29 least 18 years of age but not yet 26 years of age for the issuance of a certified copy of 30 the person's birth certificate. A person may establish that the person is unhoused under 31 this subsection by providing the state registrar with written verification on a form 01 prescribed by the department. 02 * Sec. 4. AS 18.65.310(c) is amended to read: 03 (c) Any person who knowingly makes a fraudulent written statement or 04 application for an identification card concerning age, unhoused status, race, sex, or 05 other identifying characteristics as required by the department is guilty of a 06 misdemeanor. 07 * Sec. 5. AS 18.65.310(g) is repealed and reenacted to read: 08 (g) A person applying for an identification card that is not federally compliant 09 under (a) of this section may not be charged for the issuance of the card if the person 10 is 11 (1) 60 years of age or older; or 12 (2) unhoused and at least 18 years of age but not yet 26 years of age. 13 * Sec. 6. AS 18.65.310 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 14 (s) A person may establish that the person is unhoused under (g)(2) of this 15 section by providing the department with written verification on a form prescribed by 16 the department. 17 (t) When issuing an identification card that is not federally compliant to a 18 person who meets the requirements in (g)(2) of this section, the department 19 (1) may display on the card an address other than a principal residence 20 if the address is where 21 (A) the person is most frequently located and the person 22 provides the department with a list of the locations where the person is 23 frequently located; or 24 (B) an organization that provides services to people who are 25 unhoused is located and the organization provides a written declaration 26 verifying that the person uses those services at that address; 27 (2) shall accept as proof of identity from the person 28 (A) an expired or unexpired government-issued photo 29 identification; 30 (B) two of the following documents: 31 (i) an official secondary or postsecondary school record 01 that contains the name, the date of birth, and a description of the 02 person; 03 (ii) an education or medical record containing the name 04 and date of birth of the person; 05 (iii) an affidavit from another person attesting to the 06 person's identity; 07 (iv) other documents containing requisite information to 08 prove identity as determined by the department in regulation; or 09 (C) other proof of identity accepted by the department for an 10 identification card that is not federally compliant. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.